Florida, session 2026, SB520.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSubsection (5) of section 121.031, Florida 18 Statutes, is amended to read: 19 121.031âAdministration of system; appropriation; oaths; 20 actuarial studies; public records.â 21 (5)âAll records identifying participants in any state 22 retirement plan administered by the division and held by the 23 division or the state board are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Such information may be 25 disclosed to another governmental entity in furtherance of the 26 official duties and responsibilities of the division or state 27 board without waiver of the exemption. This subsection is 28 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 29 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, 30 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 31 Legislature The names and addresses of retirees are confidential 32 and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) to the extent 33 that no state or local governmental agency may provide the names 34 or addresses of such persons in aggregate, compiled, or list 35 form to any person except to a public agency engaged in official 36 business. However, a state or local government agency may 37 provide the names and addresses of retirees from that agency to 38 a bargaining agent as defined in s. 447.203(12) or to a retiree 39 organization for official business use. Lists of names or 40 addresses of retirees may be exchanged by public agencies, but 41 such lists shall not be provided to, or open for inspection by, 42 the public. Any person may view or copy any individualâs 43 retirement records at the Department of Management Services, one 44 record at a time, or may obtain information by a separate 45 written request for a named individual for which information is 46 desired. 47 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 48 necessity that all records identifying members, payees, or 49 beneficiaries of state retirement plans administered by the 50 Division of Retirement and held by the division or the State 51 Board of Administration be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), 52 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 53 Constitution. The release of sensitive information included in 54 such records could allow predatory individuals and organizations 55 to take advantage of retirement plan members, payees, and 56 beneficiaries. Exempting this information from public records 57 requirements allows the members, payees, and beneficiaries to 58 invest their funds without the fear of their sensitive 59 information being disclosed without their consent. Additionally, 60 investment plan members, who also participate in the Florida 61 Retirement System, currently have their personal identifying 62 information protected, and this exemption would provide uniform 63 protection of records to all Florida Retirement System members, 64 payees, and beneficiaries regardless of the retirement plan they 65 select. For these reasons, the Legislature finds that it is a 66 public necessity to exempt such information from public records 67 requirements. 68 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.